Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-219
Village; dissolution; village property, records, and funds; disposition.

Upon the effective date of the abolishment of incorporation, all corporate property and corporate records belonging to the village shall be transferred to the county board of the county in which the village is located. All funds of the village not otherwise disposed of shall be transferred to the county treasurer to be paid out by order of the county board as it sees fit.

Laws 1885, c. 17, § 5, p. 157;

R.S.1913, § 5069;

C.S.1922, § 4241;

C.S.1929, § 17-219;

R.S.1943, § 17-219;

Laws 1998, LB 1346, § 5.